Wyoming, session 2026, SF0119.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-2-1014.4 is created to read:
9-2-1014.4. Appropriation to the public school
foundation program account.
For fiscal year 2027 and in each fiscal year thereafter,
from unencumbered and unobligated funds available for
expenditure in the legislative stabilization reserve
account, there is appropriated an amount equal to
forty-five percent (45%) of the amount that may be credited
to the legislative stabilization reserve account under W.S.
9-4-719(q)(i) from the legislative stabilization reserve
account to the public school foundation program account.
Section 2. W.S. 9-2-1013(d)(iii)(C), 9-4-220.1 and
9-4-719(b)(intro) and (q)(i) are amended to read:
9-2-1013. State budget; distribution of copies to
legislators; copies and reports of authorizations;
interfund loans.
(d) In addition to the items contained in subsection
(a) of this section and notwithstanding any other
recommendations made by the governor, the state budget
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0119
ENROLLED ACT NO. 29, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
shall also include the governor's recommendations for
appropriations for the ensuing two (2) years, or if a
supplemental budget request, the remainder of the budget
period, subject to the following:
(iii) The total recommended appropriations under
this subsection shall not include any of the following:
(C) An appropriation from the legislative
stabilization reserve account, to the extent the
recommended appropriation together with any appropriation
under W.S. 9-2-1014.3, other recommended contingent
appropriation or other recommended appropriation from the
legislative stabilization reserve account would exceed in
any fiscal year five percent (5%) twenty percent (20%) of
the balance of that account as of the first day of the
fiscal year in which the recommendation is made;
9-4-220.1. Wyoming state penitentiary capital
construction account; funds transferred to the account.
(a) There is created the Wyoming state penitentiary
capital construction account. within the strategic
investments and projects account created by W.S. 9-4-220.
Funds in the account shall only be expended upon
legislative appropriation. Through the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2034, all funds within the account shall be
invested in the pool A investment account by the state
treasurer pursuant to W.S. 9-4-715(p). Thereafter, all
funds within the account shall be invested as determined by
the state treasurer. All investment earnings from the
account shall be credited to the account. For purposes of
accounting and investing only, the Wyoming state
penitentiary capital construction account shall be treated
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0119
ENROLLED ACT NO. 29, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
as a separate account from the strategic investments and
projects account.
(b) Beginning on June 30, 2021 2027 for fiscal year
2021 2027 and June 30 of each fiscal year thereafter as
provided in this subsection, the state treasurer shall
transfer ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00), or as much
thereof as is available, from any unobligated funds within
the strategic investments and projects account general fund
to the Wyoming state penitentiary capital construction
account. The state treasurer shall cease transferring funds
to the Wyoming state penitentiary capital construction
account pursuant to this subsection on July 1, 2038.
9-4-719. Investment earnings; spending policy
amounts; permanent funds.
(b) There is created the permanent Wyoming mineral
trust fund reserve account. All funds within the account
shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized
under W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d), (e) and (r) and all investment
earnings from the account shall be credited to the account.
Except for funds specified by the legislature that
guarantee the obligations of permanent Wyoming mineral
trust fund investment earnings and funds to be transferred
into the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund, funds
deposited into the reserve account created by this
subsection are intended to be inviolate and constitute a
permanent or perpetual trust fund. Beginning July 1, 2021
for fiscal year 2022 and each fiscal year thereafter, to
the extent funds are available, the state treasurer shall
transfer unobligated funds from this account to the general
fund on a quarterly, pro-rata basis as necessary to ensure
that an amount equal to two and one-half percent (2.5%) of
the previous five (5) year average market value of the
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0119
ENROLLED ACT NO. 29, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund, calculated on the
first day of the fiscal year, is available for expenditure
during each fiscal year. As soon as possible after the end
of each of the fiscal years beginning on and after July 1,
2017, after making any transfer required pursuant to
paragraphs (i) and (ii) of by this subsection, revenues in
this account in excess of two hundred forty-five percent
(245%) of the spending policy amount in subsection (d) of
this section shall be credited to the permanent Wyoming
mineral trust fund. For fiscal year 2020 2027 and for each
fiscal year thereafter:
(q) The earnings from the permanent Wyoming mineral
trust fund under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(iii) during each fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2016, which are less than the
spending policy established in subsection (d) of this
section are appropriated from the general fund subject to
subsection (s) of this section and the following:
(i) Any earnings in excess of two and one-half
percent (2.5%) of the previous five (5) year average market
value of the trust fund, calculated from the first day of
the fiscal year and less than or equal to the spending
policy amount specified in subsection (d) of this section
shall be credited to the strategic investments and projects
legislative stabilization reserve account; created by W.S.
9-4-220;
Section 3. W.S. 9-4-220 and 9-4-719(b)(i) are
repealed.
Section 4. The strategic investments and projects
account is repealed.
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0119
ENROLLED ACT NO. 29, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 5. On July 1, 2026, all funds in the
strategic investments and projects account, except for
funds in the Wyoming state penitentiary capital
construction account, shall be transferred by the state
auditor to the general fund. Any unexpended funds that have
been appropriated or obligated from the strategic
investments and projects account on or before July 1, 2026
shall be paid from the general fund. Any funds that are
directed to revert by law to the strategic investments and
projects account shall revert to the general fund. All
accrued revenues that would otherwise be deposited in the
strategic investments and projects account shall be
deposited in the general fund.
Section 6. Not later than October 31, 2026 and again
not later than October 31, 2027, the state auditor shall
report to the joint appropriations committee on the amounts
transferred under section 5 of this act.
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0119
ENROLLED ACT NO. 29, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 7. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
6